North Carolina statutes. Chapter 160B. Consolidated City-County Act.
Article 1A. Consolidated City-County Powers and Governance.

§ 160B-2.1.
Powers of consolidated city-county.

A consolidated city-county shall have and may exercise or may hereafter be authorized or required to exercise the powers, duties, functions, rights, privileges, and immunities granted to:

A county under the Constitution and the general laws of the State of North Carolina, throughout its jurisdiction; and

A city under the Constitution and the general laws of the State of North Carolina, within an urban service district.

Outside the boundaries of an urban service district, the consolidated city-county shall have and may exercise or may hereafter be authorized or required to exercise the same powers, duties, functions, rights, privileges, and immunities granted to a city under the Constitution and the general laws of the State of North Carolina that can be exercised or may hereafter be authorized or required to exercise outside of city boundaries.

History.

1995, c. 461, s. 1.

Funds for Local Government Water and Sewer Improvement Grants.

Session Laws 2007-323, s. 13.13A, provides for the use of certain funds appropriated to the Rural Economic Development Center, Inc. for the 2007-2008 fiscal year for wastewater-related and public water system-related projects. See note at

G.S. 160A-311

.

§ 160B-2.2.
Dissolution of consolidated city-county; establishment of study commission; purposes and powers of study commission.

The governing board of a consolidated city-county may by resolution establish a governmental study commission to study all matters pertaining to the dissolution of the consolidated city-county and reestablishment of separate city and county government. The study commission may:

Prepare a report of its findings and conclusions.

Prepare drafts of any agreements or legislation necessary to effect the dissolution of a consolidated city-county.

Prepare a plan for dissolution of the consolidated city-county.

A study commission established pursuant to this section may:

Adopt rules and regulations for the conduct of its business.

Employ personnel.

Contract with consultants.

Hold hearings in the furtherance of its business.

Take any other action necessary or expedient to the furtherance of its business.

History.

1995, c. 461, s. 1.

§ 160B-2.3.
Ethics.

The governing board shall adopt a resolution or policy containing a code of ethics, as required by

G.S. 160A-86

.

All members of the governing board, whether elected or appointed, shall receive the ethics education required by

G.S. 160A-87

.

History.

2009-403, s. 5.

§§ 160B-2.4 through 160B-2.6.

Reserved for future codification purposes.